Hawaii statutes.
§103D-807 Use of payments received by a
supplying public procurement unit. All payments from any public
procurement unit or external procurement unit received by a public procurement
unit supplying personnel or services shall be available to the supplying public
procurement unit as authorized by law. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2; am L 1998, c
11, §12]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next